Hawaii statutes.
[§481M-2] Lease-purchase agreement defined.
A lease-purchase agreement is an agreement for the use of personal property by
a natural person primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, for an
initial period of four months or less that:

(1) Is automatically renewable with each payment
after the initial period;

(2) Does not obligate or require the lessee to
continue leasing or using the property beyond the initial period; and

(3) Permits the lessee to become the owner of the
property. [L 1997, c 248, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next